District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

15-383

Grounds for nonrecognition.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-84, § 2, 42 DCR 6787
Feb. 24, 2012, D.C. Law 19-86, § 2(c), 58 DCR 11186

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 15-383.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 4 of the Uniform Foreign Money-Judgments Recognition Act.